Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,152
Workers' compensation insurance; association; how treated.

An association which obtains insurance policies in compliance with sections 44-3,151 to 44-3,155 is not an insurer and is not transacting the business of insurance under the laws of this state.

Laws 1996, LB 515, § 2.